Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1748.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XX‒NPILOT PROGRAM FOR HOMELESS YOUTHIN HIGHER EDUCATIONSection 2001-N. Definitions. The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Institution of higher education." A community college 12345678910111213141516171819 operating under Article XIX-A or a university within the State System of Higher Education under Article XX-A."Pilot program." The Pilot Program for Homeless Youth in Higher Education established under section 2002-N(a)."Student experiencing homelessness." A student enrolled in an institution of higher education who is either currently without a domicile or who has experienced homelessness within the past two years.Section 2002-N. Establishment and guidelines. (a) Establishment.--The Pilot Program for Homeless Youth in Higher Education is established in the Department of Education.(b) Participants.--The State Board of Higher Education shall select six institutions of higher education, consisting of four community colleges and two universities within the State System of Higher Education which are geographically dispersed, to participate in a pilot program to provide assistance to students experiencing homelessness. An institution of higher education chosen to participate in the pilot program shall provide accommodations to students experiencing homelessness, including all of the following:(1) Access to laundry facilities.(2) Access to storage.(3) Access to locker room and shower facilities.(4) Reduced-price meals or meal plans and access to food banks.(5) Access to technology.(6) Access to short-term housing or housing assistance, especially during seasonal breaks.(7) Case management services.(c) Housing.--An institution of higher education 20250HB1748PN2154 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 participating in the pilot program may establish plans to develop surplus property for affordable housing to accommodate the needs of students experiencing homelessness.(d) Resources.--An institution of higher education participating in the pilot program shall leverage existing community resources by providing information that is available for individuals experiencing homelessness, including through nonprofit organizations, local housing agencies and the Department of Human Services, to students experiencing homelessness in the pilot program.(e) Report.--By December 1, 2027, an institution of higher education participating in the pilot program shall provide a report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives that includes at least the following information:(1) The number of students experiencing homelessness or food insecurity who were attending the institution of higher education during the pilot program. The State Board of Higher Education shall coordinate with the institution of higher education to collect voluntary data on how many students experiencing homelessness or food insecurity are attending the institution of higher education.(2) The number of students assisted by the pilot program.(3) Strategies for accommodating students experiencing homelessness or food insecurity.(4) Recommendations for legislation to better serve students experiencing homelessness or food insecurity.20250HB1748PN2154 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) Voluntary participation.--An institution of higher education not selected to participate in the pilot program may participate voluntarily and may submit the report required of the pilot program participants under subsection (e), regardless of participation status.(g) Expiration.--The pilot program shall operate for a minimum of two academic years, beginning with the academic year that starts at least six months after the effective date of this subsection.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1748PN2154 - 4 - 12345678910